sl-SI: Vrsta pedala: Visoka; Perforirano; Nizka; Trden; Drugo
de: Fußmaschinentyp: Longboard; Perforiert; Shortboard; Solide; Sonstiges
pl: Typ podnóżka: Longboard; Perforowany; Shortboard; Stały; Inne
en: Footboard type: Longboard; Perforated; Shortboard; Solid; Other
th: ประเภทแผ่นวางเท้า: บอร์ดยาว; แบบเจาะรู; บอร์ดสั้น; โซลิด; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de estribo: Tabla larga; Perforado; Tabla corta; Sólido; Otros
it: Tipo di pedana: Longboard; Perforata; Shortboard; Solido; Altro
fr: Type de marchepied: Planche longue; Perforé; Planche courte; Solide; Autre
da: Fodbrættype: Longboard; Perforeret; Shortboard; Solid; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de estribo: Longboard; Perfurado; Shortboard; Maciço; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte de pé: Longboard; Perfurado; Shortboard; Sólido; Outro
sv: Typ av fotbräda: Longboard; Perforerad; Shortboard; Solid; Övrigt
nb: Type fotbrett: Longboard; Perforert; Shortboard; Fast; Annet
zh-CN: 踏板类型: 长板; 打孔; 短板; 坚固; 其他
hu: Lábtartó típusa: Hosszú; Perforált; Rövid; Szilárd; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ stupačky: Dlhý; Perforovaný; Krátky; Tuhý; Iné
ja: フットボードタイプ: ロングボード; ミシン目; ショートボード; ソリッド; その他
ko: 풋보드 유형: 롱보드; 구멍 뚫림; 쇼트보드; 솔리드; 기타
bg-BG: Тип стъпало: Лонгборд; Перфориран; Шортборд; Твърд; Други
lt-LT: Pedalo plokštės tipas: Ilgieji; Perforuoti; Trumpieji; Visos pėdos; Kita
zh-TW: 踏板類型: 長板; 穿孔式; 短板; 實心; 其他
cs: Typ plochy pedálu: Longboard; Perforované; Shortboard; Pevná; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta papučice: Duga daska; Perforirana; Kratka daska; Čvrsto; Ostalo
el: Τύπος βάσης ποδιού: Longboard; Διάτρητη; Shortboard; Στερεάς μορφής; Άλλο
tr: Basamak Tipi: Uzun tahta; Perfore; Kısa tahta; Düz; Diğer
ru: Тип платформы: Лонгборд; Перфорированный; Шортборд; Твердый; Другой
vi: Loại tấm để chân: Ván dài; Đục lỗ; Ván ngắn; Lốp rắn; Khác
nl: Ledikanttype: Longboard; Geperforeerd; Shortboard; Stevig; Andere
fi: Astinlautatyyppi: Longboard; Rei'itetty; Shortboard; Kiinteä; Muu
ro-RO: Tip placă: Lung; Perforat; Scurt; Solid; Altele